District of Columbia statutes.
31-1602

Application of chapter.

The requirements of this chapter shall apply to the practices and procedures employed by insurers and their agents and employees in making determinations about any individual or group policy or contract of health, disability, or life insurance.

Aug. 7, 1986, D.C. Law 6-132, § 3, 33 DCR 3615
1981 Ed., § 35-222.